Florida, session 2026, HB1459.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of section
733.303, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
733.303 Persons not qualified.—
(1) A person is not qualified to act as a personal
representative if the person:
(a)1. Has been convicted of a felony, unless the person is
a parent, spouse, child, or grandchild of the deceased who is
not currently incarcerated and there are no other family members
of the same degree of consanguinity to serve.
2. If a family member of a decedent petitions to be
appointed as personal representative and has a felony
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1459-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1459 2026
conviction, the court shall make the determination to grant the
petition pursuant to Article VI, Section 4 of the State
Constitution and use the following criteria to evaluate the
petitioner's ability to serve as personal representative:
a. If the decedent was the victim of the felony.
b. If the petitioner was convicted for a violation of
chapters 812 or 817 or a crime involving dishonesty, theft, or
fraud.
c. The nature and circumstances of the offense.
d. The timing of the offense including the petitioner's
age at the time of the offense and, if applicable, the length of
time since the petitioner was released from incarceration.
e. Any concerns of interested parties.
f. Evidence of rehabilitation.
g. Whether civil rights have been restored.
h. The relationship of the decedent and petitioner at the
time of the decedent's death and for at least 2 years prior.
3. The court may use any of the criteria under
subparagraph 2. when determining if a petition will be granted.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1459-00